src/org/daisy/dotify/hyphenator/impl/resource-files/dict/hyph_sv_SE.dic
u2s3pen
us3pi
us5p1ra
us2sc2h
u2s1s
us2sku
ussk2
us2sla
uss1l2
us2s1le
us2s1li
us2sm
us2sn2
us2s1po
ussp2
us2s1te
usst2
us2s1tu
us2ta1f
us1ta
u1s2tik
us1ti
u1s2tit
ust1r
ust3ra1tö
ust2rat
ust1ra
u3st2rer
ust1re
ust4sk
u2s2ts
u2st3å
us3un
us1v2
u1s2ven
us5år
u1s3å4s
u2så2sa
u1s3ä
u2s1ö2go
u1sö
usö2g
u2ta2lu
u1ta
u2t3a2nk
u2t3a2n1v
ut5a2r1k
u2tav
1utbi
u2t1b2
ut2e1da
u1te
ut2ek
ut2el
u4t5e2n1l4
ute5st
ut2es
u2te4u
u4t4i.
u1ti
utik2
uti2ks3
5u4t5i2n1n
ut5i2n1t2
uti5ö
ut1j
uto4p5isk
u1to
ut2op
uto1pi
ut5o2r4d
uto3s2
utpos2
u2t1p2
ut1po
ut1r
1utru
2utsid
u2ts
ut1si
uts2o
ut1s2p2
uts2ta
ut1st
ut5sål
1uttag
u2tt
ut1ta
utti5o2n1d
ut1ti
utt4j
u4t5ut
u1tu
ut1v
1ut1v2ec2
u2t1ve
u3ty
ut1å
ut1ö
utö2k
u1t2ör
u2tö2v
u1u
2uv
u1va
u1ve
u5vi4s.
u1vi
u2vs2
uv3so
u2v1t2
uv2tåt
uv3un
u1vu
u3vy
u2v3åk
u5vån
u3vä
u3vö
u3å
u3ö
2v.
va3d1re
vad1r
va3dro
1vak
2v1ak1ti
va2kt
va1ku
vals3k
va2ls
2va2nar
va1na
van5de
va2n1d
vand5r
van1ge
va2ng1
van2ger
v1an1no
va2n1n
van5o2m.
va1no
vano5s
4va2n1p
vans3ko
va2ns
2vansl2
v3ante2n1n
va2n1t
van1te
4van1ti
4van3å
va2nä
va2r1ak
va1ra
2va2r1b
va2rem
va1re
var5est
va4r4i.
va1ri
va4ri5b
va2r3i2n1t
var2st
va2rs
var2t3r
va2rt
1va1ru
va4rut
var2vs3
va2r1v
vasi5s
va1si
va4so
1vat
va2tek
va1te
4vau
2v1b2
2v1c
2v1d2
vde2ls4
v1de
v5d1v4
1v2ec2
ve1g4
ve2gen
ve4ig
ve1i
ve2k3l
ve3ko
3ve2kt
1vel
ve5le
4ve1li
ve1lo
ve2mal
v2e1ma
2ve2n1b2
ve4ned1
ve1ne
venti4ö
ve2n1t
ven1ti
ven2t2s
ve3ny
ve2r1g2
veri2l
ve1ri
verläg5e2n.
ve2r1l4
verlä2ge
verläg5e2ns
verläg5e2s
verläg5et
ver2s3ex1
ve2rs
ver1se
ver5si
vers2m
verö2s
ves5pa
v2e1sp
ves5per
ve2s1po
ve2spr
2vesso
ve2s1s
ve1st
ve2sta5l4e
ve1s2tal
ves1ta
ves2te
vest5r
1ve1ta
5ve1te
3vetsm
ve2ts
2vé
2v1f
2v1g2
2v1h
1vi
vi2abl2
vi1a
via1b
2viav
vi2b1ra
vi1b
vib2re
vi2ce1h
vi1c2e
vi2ces2
vi2d1r
vil2d5an
vi2ld
vil1da
vi2lin
vi1li
2vi2m1n
vi4nes
vi1ne
vin5g4las
vi2ng1
vink1l
vi2nk
vi2no
vint3r
vi2n1t
vi1ny
2vi1ro
vi4s1in
vi1si
vi1so
v1i2sol
vis5pi
vis3ta
vi1su
3vi1ta
4vi2t2c
vitt5r
vi2tt
v5jo
v1jä
2v1k2
2v1l
vlar5me
vla2r1m
vling4es
v1li
vli2ng1
v4l4öt
2v1m
vmä5ta
v1mä
2v1n2
1vo
vo3c2
2vo1f
v1o2f1f
2v3o1g
2v1om
vo2n4n
vo5ro
v5ox1
2v1p2
vpat3
v1pa
v4rak
v1ra
vre1g2
v1re
v3rik
v5rit
v1ro
v1ru
vrus4ta2d.
vrus1ta
v5råa
v3råd
v5råt
v3rät
v1rö
2vs
v2s1in
v1si
v1sk2
vs2ke
v2skv
v1sl2
vs3lot
vs2mak
vs1ma
vs2mi
v1sn2
v2s1na
vs2ni
vs2no
vso4r
v1sp
vs2pa
vs2po
v2s1s2
v1st2
vs2ta
vs2t2op
vs1to
v2s3tro
vs2tu
v1s2ug
vs3vå
vsv2
v3svä
v1så
vså3re
v1så2s
vsä5g
v1sä
v2s3ä2r
v2sö2d
v1sö
v2s1ör
2v1t
vta2b
v1ta
vtal2
vta2ls3
vt2r
vt2vi
vt4vu
v4ty
1vu
vu2d3a
v2ud
vu2d3o
v2u4i
vul2st
v4u2ls
2v3up
vur2st
vu2rs
vurs5te
2v1ut
2v1v
vv4rak
vv1ra
1vyr
v1y2t
vyt5an
vy1ta
vyt5as
v3yx1
4v5ådr
1v2åg
2våk
vå4ka
vå3kr4
5vå2ld
vå5lå
vå2ran
vå1ra
vår5a2ns
1v2å2rd
vå4r5er
vå1re
vår3i4s5
vår3ut
vås2
vå5sk
vå1st
v5ä2d1l
1väg
vä1ga
vä2g5un
vä1gu
vä2l
vä1l1a
3vä2l5d
vä1l5e
väls2m
vä2ls
vä2ne
2vä2ng1
1vä2n1l4
vä2n5n
vä2ror
vä1ro
1väs
vä2sk
väs2ta
väst5an
väs3tar
v5ä2t5n2
1väx1
v5öl
1vör
vöre5nas
vöre2na
vö1re
1wa
wa2d
2wa2ld
wa2n3d
wa2n4s
wa4p
wa1p5a
wa2par
wa1p5e
was4
we2
w2h
wh2i2
wi2en
wi1e
wi2r
w1l
w3nö
wo1b2
w2t
wur2st
wu2rs
wurs5te
w2åg5
x1
x2ae
xae2d2e
xa1ed
x2ag
xa2lä
xan2d4ra
xa2n1d
xand1r
xdå5
x4e1e
x4e1h
xe2l1
xe2ld2
xe2rs2
x1f4
x4i.
xi2d1ut
xi1du
x4i5g4l
xi3k
xi2n1in
xi1ni
xi3so
xi1st
xis2te
xi4s1ti
xit2
xk2
xo2b
xofö2
xo1f
xp2
xs2
xt3a2rt
x1ta
x2t3av
xti2la
x1ti
xt2il
xt3in
xti3o2n1d
xt3or
x1to
xt2ra
xt2re
x2tri
x2ts2
xt5å
x2t3ä
xvan2
xy1
y1a
yb2liv
y1b
ybl2
yb1li
yc2
yck2s3k2
y4ck1
yc2ks
yckså5re
yck1så
yck5v
yda2m
y1da
yd4en
y1de
y2do
yd1r
yd1s2t2
y2ds
y1du5
y2dä
y1e
yed5r
y2eu
yeu5rs
yf2t2s3
y1f
y2ft
y1ga
y1ge2
yg2gj
y4gg
yg2gs2
yg1g3å2
yg2går
yg2gås
yg1l
yg1n2
y2go1f
y1go
yg3ro
ygr2
yg2si
y2gs1
yg2sj
yg2sk2
yg5sn2
yg3s2u
y4g5å
yg3ä2
y1i
yi2ns2
y1j
y1ka
y2k3ak
y1ki
yk5lad
yk5la1me
yk5lan
yk5lat
y5k2lin
yk1li
y3k2list
yk3lo1i
yk3lon
y1ko
ykt5r
y2kt
y3kä
y5kö
y1la
y2le1f
y1le
yle1n2e
yl2klo
yl1k
yl5lä2n1d
y1lo
yl3s2l2
y2ls
yl5u
y3lå
y1lä
ym2di
y2m1d
ym2dr
ym4fl
y2m1f
ym2for
y5mj
ym2pl
y2m1p
ym2tak
y2mt
ym1ta
ym4t5v
ym5un
y1må
y4n1a2rt
y1na
ynd2r
y2n1d
yn5est
y1ne
yng4it
y2ng1
yn1gi
yn2g2os
yn1go
yng5r2
yng5s2u
yn2gs1
y2ni2n1t2
y1ni
ynk1l
y2nk
ynk4ra
yn1kr4
yn5ne
y2n1n
yn2san
y2ns
yn1sa
yn3s2te
yn2sva
ynsv2
yn1sä2
y3nå
4yo
y1od
yo4pe
y1or
yo5st
y3ou
yp2e1ra
y1pi
y1pl
ypo5s
y1po
yp5pe
y2pp
y1p2re
yp3ri
yp5so
y3på1
y3pö
y5q2
yrad5en
y1ra
yra1de
yrad5er
yr1di5
y2rd
y2r3e2n1h
y1re
yres3v2
y1ri
yr2k1k2
y2r1k
y1ro
yr1s1h
y2rs
yr2sl2
yr3slo
yrs5n2
yr1s2t
yr5t4a
y2rt
yrti3o2n1d
yr1ti
y3ru
y1rå
yråk2
yr3år
yrå2ra
y3rö
ys5a2ns
y1sa
y3s2a2ts
y5sch4e
ysc2h
ysi1o
y1si
ys3kar
ys5ke
y2sk3l
ys1ko
y5s4k4o.
ys2kol
y1sk2r4
y5snö
ysn2
ys4o2pr
ys2s1l2
y2s1s
ys2sm
ys2sn2
ys2st2
ys2sv2
ys2tar
ys1ta
y2s5ta2r1n
y4s5ta2rs
y1s2ta2rt
y5stav
ys2tek
ys1te
ys2tor
ys1to
y5så
yta3b
y1ta
yt2e2s
y1te
yt5im
y1ti
y2to2ms
y1to
yt1or
y1try
yt2s1pa
y2ts
yt1sp2
yt1s2t
ytti2ng4
y2tt
yt1ti
yt3vå
y1tä
y1u4
y4un
yut5
y5va
y1ve
y1v4o
yvor5de
yvo2rd
y1vä
y1w
y3z
y1å
yår2
y3ö
4z.
3za
za3k2
z2a4w
ze2b5
ze2e
ze1l
zer3o
zet2te
ze2tt
2zg
3zi
zi5s1ta
z5j
zo2n3g2
zo2n3o
4zs
z5sc
2zt
1zu
1zy
2z1z
2å.
å5ad
å3a4l
åa1l5a
åa2lar
åa1l5e
å1an
å1ar
å1as
å5at
å5ax1
åc2
å4dav
å1da
å1dj
å5drar
åd1ra
å5dro1g
åd3sl2
å2ds
åd5s1ma
åd5s4n2
åd2s1te
åd1st2
å3då
2å1e
åe1l5a
åf2l
å1f
åf2r4
2åg
å1ga
å5g4a.
å5gad
å5ga2r.
åg3a2r1m
å5ga2r1n
å5ga2rs
å5gat
å1ge
åge2l
å2ge2ne
åges2
å4g5g
åg1l
å3glas
åg2no
åg1n
åg5o1k
å1go
åg3om
å5gor
åg1rä
ågr2
åg3s2k2
å2gs1
åg1st
åg1s2ta1di3
åg3stad
ågs1ta
ågstadie1e3
ågstadi1e
åg2str
åg2su
åg3s2va
ågsv2
å4gut
å1gu
åg5ä
åhos5
å1h
å1i
å1j
å1kal
å5k2e.
å1ke
1å4ker
å2ke2r.
åke2r3a
å1ki
å2k1na
åk1n
å2k1ni
åk4no
åk4nä
å1ko
å1k1ra
åkr4
åk2re
åk4se
å2ks
åk2ska
åk1sk2
åk1s2t
å1ku
å1k5ve
å5kä
å3kö
å1la
å2l3a2rt2
4ål2d.
å2ld
4ål1da
1ålder
ål1de
å5le1g
å1le
ål1k2
åll2sk
ål2ls
åll4sp2
ål3o2p
ål2san
å2ls
ål1sa
ål2se
ål5sko
ål5s1n2
ål2so2
ål2säg
ål1sä
ål4söv
ål1sö
4å4lt
ål3tr
ål5ul
ål3up
å5ly
å3låd
ål5åk2
ålå2ke
å1lä
ål3ög
å1m
ån2dak
å2n1d
ån1da
ånd2st2
ån2ds
ån2go
å2ng1
ån2g3r2
ång5ska
ån2gs1
ångsk2
ång1s3ten
ång2s1te
ång5str
å2n5k4
ån5o2rd
å1no
ånor2d5e
åns4kar
å2ns
åns2ke
ån2s5k2e.
åns2te
ån1sä5
å2n1t2
ånå2re
ån1år
å1o
åor5de
åo2rd
å1p
å2p1n2
å2p3o2p
å1po
åpo2r4d
åp2r
å2ps
åp5sl2
å4p3su
åp2uk4
å1pu
å2ra2kt
å1ra
år5a2n1t
å4r5a2s1s
å2rav
2å2rd
år2dex1
år1de
år2do
år5d4ra
åri2s5a
å3riv
å2r4j
årlå5re
å2r1l
år3om
år3os
å2rs1
år2si
års4ol
år1so
år2sve
år1sv2
år2sö
år2t3s2
å2rt
år5ul
å1rum
år5up
å2r3v
år5å
å3rä
år1ö
år4ö.
år4öd
å1r4ör
å5s4a.
å1sa
åsa2n
å5sa2n1d
ås3a1n1o
å5sas
2åser
å1se
å2s1f2
å2s5kar
å4s1kas
åsk5ris
å1skr4
åsk2ri
åsk5rä
å2sk3v
1å1skå
å4skö
åsk5ön
å3slag
åsl2
å2s5lak
ås3lam
ås4li
å5s2m
å2s1ne3
åsn2
å1so
å2s3o2r1k
å1sp
ås2pa
ås2pon
ås1po
4å2s1s2
ås2ti
ås2to
åst5ra
ås2tu
ås5tån
å1stå
å2sun
ås3u2ng1
ås3ve
åsv2
å2s1vi
åsving4es
åsvi2ng1
åså5re
å2t3ap
å1ta
å1te2
åt2er1
å3te2r1n
1å2t1g2
å1t2j
3å2t1k2
åt5om
å1to
å3t2re
åt1ri
å1t2rå
åt5rö
åt2sj
å2ts
åt3sl2
åt5s1mi
åt1st2
åt1te2
å2tt
åtti5o2n1d
åt1ti
åt5tä
åt2vin
åt1vi
åt1vä
å5ty
åtå5re
å1tö
å1u
åup2pa
åu2pp
2å1v
åves2
å4v1ra
åxt4
åx1
å3z
å1å
å1ä
åä4ta2n
åä1ta
å3ög
ä1a
äb2b1l2
ä1b
ä2b1b
äb2les
äbl2
äb1le
äc2
äck5v
ä4ck1
ä2da1f
ä1da
2ä2dd
äde2l3s
ä1de
äde2s5s
äde2st
äd1r
äds1l2
ä2ds
ä1e
äf2l
ä1f
äf1li5
äf3so
ä4fs
ä5gad
äga2r3a
ä5gat
ä1ge
ä3ge2n1h
äge2s
äg2gu
ä4gg
äg1l
äg1r2
äg2sa
ä2gs1
äg1s2e
äg2si
äg2skr4
ägsk2
äg5s2t1b2
äg2s4t2e.
ägs1te
äg5s2ts
äg5un
ä1gu
ä3i
ä1ka
äka2ri
ä3ka2rs
ä1ki
äk1l
ä3ko
äk1r4
ä3kå
äkå5ka
ä1la
äla5g
äle4t
ä1le
äl5in
ä1li
älk2li
äl1k
äl2kå
äll2si
äl2ls
äl5län
äl2mak
äl1m
äl1ma
älo4
äl2ps
äl1p
äls1ko
ä2ls
äl5skö
äl5sla
älsl2
äl5s1ma
äl5trä
ä4lt
äl1u
äl5v4a.
äl1va
äl2v5ak
äl5vas
äl1vi2
äl2vän
äl1vä
ä3lå
äl3ö2
äm2k1n
ä2m1k
1äm1ne
ä2m1n
äm2n1år
äm2p1l
ä2m1p
3ändam
ä2n1d
än1da
än2d3ra
änd1r
än2dri
än5gav
ä2ng1
äng5el
äng4e1se
än2gor
än1go
äng3r2
äng3se
än2gs1
än5ke
ä2nk
änk1l
än5kå
än2n4äs
ä2n1n
än1nä
ä2n3o
än2sar
ä2ns
än1sa
äns1l2
äns3t2er
äns1te
än2te1g
ä2n1t
än1te
än2t3r
än2t3u
ä5nö
ä1pe
ä1pi
äp5r
äpsa2k
äp1sa
ä2p5s4k
ä2p4st2
ä3på1
ä2r1ak
ä1ra
ä2r5a2re1a
ära1re
ä2r5av
ä2r3ax1
4ä2rd
ärd2st2
är2ds
ärds5å
ä4re1f
ä1re
ä2r3e4gg
äre1g
ä4rem
är5e1mo
ärför1u5
ä2r1f
är2g3l
ä2r1g
är2gr2
ärg2ra
ä1ri
är5i5b
ärk2st
ä2r1k
är2ks
är2k1vi
är2lkr4
ä2r1l
ärl1k
är5men
ä2r1m
är1me
ärm3e2ti
är2n3e2k
ä2r1n
är1ne
är2n3i4s
är1ni
är2nö
ä1ro
är3o1må
äro1v5a
ärr5u
är1r
är4sat
ä2rs
är1sa
är2sel
är1se
är2sid
är1si
är4s2ig
är5s4ka1ra
är2s1kar
ärs2ko
ärsk3os
är3slå
ärsl2
är5slä
ärs2n2
ä2r4s5o2rs
är1so
är2spr
är1sp
är2s1ti
är1st
är2s3v2
är5så
ärså5re
är1sö5
är4t2em
ä2rt
är1te
är4tom
är1to
ärt5sl2
är2ts
ärt1s2t
ärt5sv2
är3u2
är5år
ärå2re
är5åt
är5ö.
är5ös
är3öv
äs2a2r1b
ä1sa
ä3scha
äsc2h
ä5schen
äsch4e
äs1ka
ä1s4kal
ä1s1ki
äs5k1k2
äs3k2n
äs4kon
äs2k1or
ä1s5ky
ä1s3kä
ä2s1l2
ä3s2löj
ä1so
äs5pe
äs3pi
äs2sc
ä2s1s
äs2skj
ässk2
äs2skr4
äs2s1l2
ä4s5t4a.
äs1ta
äst3a2n1f2
äs2t3a2n1v
äs3ten
äs1te
äs2tig
äs1ti
ä1s2tol
äs1to
äst3r
ä2s2ts2
äs2t5up
äs1tu
äs5t2uv
ä1s5tä
äs3u
äs3vä
äsv2
äs5å
ä2säm
ä1sä
äta2n
ä1ta
ät3a1no
ä2tap
äte1a2
ä1te
äte1i3
ät5el
äte2le
ä2tin
ä1ti
ät2s3ka
ä2ts
ät5sn2
ät4s1po
ät1sp2
ät1s2t
ät5sv2
ät4t2il
ä2tt
ät1ti
ätt2str
ätt1st2
ät2ts
ät4tv
ät4tä
ä2t1u
ä5u
ä1va
ä2va2kt
ä1vak
äv3a2r1m
ä1ve
äv1s2t2
ä2vs
äx2tar
äx1
äx1ta
äx2to
äx2tår
äxt5å
ö1a
öbe2l
ö1b
öbi2ls5
öb2lin
öbl2
öb1li
öc2
öd2a2n1r
ö1da
öde2s3
ö1de
öd2re1v
öd1re
öd5rö
öd2s1an
ö2ds
öd1sa
öd2s3at
öd1s5k2r4
öd2s1ta
öd1st2
öds5å
ö2dö
ö1e
öf2l
ö1f
ö1ga
ö4g5ad
ö2g1ak
ö4g5a2n.
ö1ge
ög5e1la
ög5e1li
öge2r
öge2r3s2
ö4gg2
ög5gr2
ög1l
ög2lop
ög2nak
ög1n
ög1na
ö2g1n1e
ög2nen
ög2ner
1ö2go
ög5o1k
ögo1n3o
ög5ry
ögr2
ög3rö
ö2g1s1
ög1s2i
ögs2k2
ög5ä
ö4gö
ö1i
ö2jak
ö1ja
öje2s3
ö1je
ö1jo
öj3ä
ö1ka
ö2kak
öke2na
ö1ke
ö1ki
ö1k2o2r4d
ökor3d5e
ök3ot
ök3ru
ökr4
ök5rä
ök4s3as
ö2ks
ök1sa
ök2s1in
ök1si
ök3so
ök1st2
ök2str
ök5sva
öksv2
ök5t1r
ö2kt
ök2ty
ök3u
öku2re
ö2kv
ök5äg
ö1la
ö2la2kt
öl4j5ak
öl1ja
öl2k1n
öl1k
öl4kv
öl2pak
öl1p
öl1pa
ölt3r
ö4lt
öl2ve
ö5ly
ö3lä
öm2kl
ö2m1k
öms5ka
ö2ms
öm1sk
öm3sla
ömsl2
öm2sp
ö2nal
ö1na
ön2d3r
ö2n1d
önes2
ö1ne
öne3sk
ön1g2r2
ö2ng1
ön5kå
ö2nk
ö2nom
ö1no
ön2so
ö2ns
önst5r
ö2n5ög
ö1o
4ö2p.
ö2p3a2r1b
ö1pa
ö1pe
ö2p3el
ö1pi
öp1l
1ö2pp
öp2rat
öp1ra
öp3ru
ö2p5rå
4öps
ö2p2sk
öp1s2l2
öp2s1tu
ö2p1st2
ö4p3sv2
öp1s5å
öp2så2r
ö2r1ak
ö1ra
ö2r3al
öra2n
ö5randet
ör2an1de
öra2n1d
ö2r1a2nk
ö2r1a2n1m
ö5ra2r.
ö3ra2rs
ö2r1b2
4ö2rd
ör1d2r
örd5så
ör2ds
ördså5re
öre2na
ö1re
ör1e1ni
ö2r1e2nk
öre3st
öre3sv2
ör5eu
ö2r3e4vig
öre1v
öre1vi
ö2r1g2
ö1ri
ör5im
ö2r1i2ns
ör1i2n1t
ö2r3ir
ö2r3iv
ör2klo
ö2r1k
ör2k1na
örk1n
ör2k1re
örkr4
ör2kru
örk2v
ö2r1l4
örlä5ge
ör1o
ör5ra
ör1r
ör2sas
ö2rs
ör1sa
ör2sc
ör1sk
örs2ka
ör2sku
ör1sl2
örs4let
örs1le
örs2li
örs2lös
ör2s1po
ör1sp
örs2ta
ör1st
ör2s3ti
ör2s1ut
ör3sål
örs3år
ör2ts4
ö2rt
ör1tv
ört2vi
ör1u4
ör1y
ör5ål
ör3ån
ör5åt
ör1ä
örä2r
ör1ö
örö2d
ör5öt
örö2va
ö2sak
ö1sa
ö2se1g
ö1se
öse2n5o
ös5kar
ös2k1ve
ös3mu
ö3so
ös2skä
ö2s1s
össk2
ös4s1le
öss1l2
ös2s2t2
ö4s5t4a.
ös1ta
ös5ta2n.
ös3ta2n1v
ös2terby
ös1te
öst2er
öste2r1b
ös5ter2n.
öste2r1n
ös5ter2ns
ös2to
ö2s2ts4
öst5så
ö1st5å
ö1st5ä
östä2t
ö5su
ö2s3ö2
4öt
ö5t2a3k1l
ö1ta
ö2ta2kt
ö2t3e2k
ö1te
öt2e2s
öte3s4t
öt2r
öt5ri
öt5ru
öt1s5t
ö2ts
öt2str
ött3ä4
ö2tt
öt3v
ö1va
4ö2v1d2
öve2
ö5v2e.
över1
öve1ri4
1översk
öve2rs
ö5ves
ö5vj
öv1r
öv2sly
ö2vs
öv1sl2
övs5ta
öv1st2
4ö2v1t
ö3vå
ö1vä
öy4
ö5yr
.b8r8o8o8k9l8a8n8d.
.p8u8l8l9o8v8e8r.
.t8v8ä8r8s9ö8v8e8r.
